District of Columbia statutes.
3-108

Cooperation from other agencies.

Agencies of the District of Columbia government shall cooperate in providing such information to the Commission as may be necessary to fulfill its statutory responsibilities.

History

Oct. 16, 1998, D.C. Law 12-167, § 9, 45 DCR 5180

Cross References

Anatomical Gift Act, see § 7-1521.01 et seq.
Cemetery associations, regulations, construction of law, see § 43-131.
Human tissue banks, application of law, see § 7-1541.06.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 2-4208.